Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.110

Auditor's procedure.

(1) For persons registering under RCW 29A.08.120, 29A.08.123, 29A.08.170, 29A.08.330, 29A.08.340, 29A.08.362, and 29A.08.365, an application is considered complete only if it contains the information required by RCW 29A.08.010. The applicant is considered to be registered to vote as of:

(a) The original date of receipt;

(b) When the person will be at least eighteen years old by the next election;

(c) When the person will be at least seventeen years old by the next primary election or presidential primary election and eighteen years old by the general election, whichever is applicable; or

(d) For voters utilizing automatic voter registration under RCW 29A.08.315 at the department of licensing, the date that an election official receives the information to register the person to vote, unless:

(i) The voter declines registration by the deadline in RCW 29A.08.359(4)(a); or

(ii) An election official receives the information to register the person to vote after the deadline to register to vote under RCW 29A.08.140(1)(a), in which case the applicant is considered to be registered to vote as of the day after the election.

(2) As soon as practicable, the auditor shall record the appropriate precinct identification, taxing district identification, and date of registration on the voter's record in the state voter registration list. The secretary of state shall, pursuant to RCW 29A.04.611, establish procedures to enable new or updated voter registrations to be recorded on an expedited basis. Any mailing address provided shall be used only for mail delivery purposes, and not for precinct assignment or residency purposes.

(3) The voter must be sent an acknowledgment notice using first-class nonforwardable mail:

(a) For voters utilizing automatic voter registration services at the department of licensing, within five business days after the receipt of an application or residential address change, or, if the application or residential address change is received after the deadline to register to vote or update a voter registration under RCW 29A.08.140 (1)(a) or (2)(a)(i), within five business days after the election, the auditor shall send an automatic voter registration acknowledgment notice package as required by RCW 29A.08.030.

(b) For all other voters, within 60 days after the receipt of an application or residential address change, the auditor shall send an acknowledgment notice as required by RCW 29A.08.030.

(4) If an application is not complete, the auditor shall promptly mail a verification notice to the applicant. The verification notice shall require the applicant to provide the missing information. If the applicant provides the required information within forty-five days, the applicant shall be registered to vote as of the original date of application. The applicant shall not be placed on the official list of registered voters until the application is complete.

(5) Once a future voter is no longer in pending status, as described in RCW 29A.08.615, his or her application to sign up to register to vote is no longer pending and is subject to this section.

[ 2023 c 466 s 4; 2020 c 208 s 14; 2019 c 391 s 5. Prior: 2018 c 112 s 2; 2018 c 110 s 101; 2018 c 109 s 4; 2009 c 369 s 10; 2005 c 246 s 5; 2004 c 267 s 107; 2003 c 111 s 206; prior: 1994 c 57 s 32; 1993 c 434 s 6. Formerly RCW 29.08.060.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 466 ss 3, 4, 6, 11, 13-16, and 20-23: See note following RCW 29A.08.030.

Effective date—2020 c 208 ss 3, 5, 6, and 13-17: See note following RCW 29A.08.210.

Short title—Findings—2020 c 208: See notes following RCW 29A.08.210.

Effective date—2018 c 112 ss 1-4: See note following RCW 29A.08.140.

Effective date—2018 c 110 ss 101-107: See note following RCW 29A.08.355.

Short title—Findings—Intent—2018 c 110: See notes following RCW 29A.08.355.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2018 c 109: See notes following RCW 29A.08.170.

Effective date—2005 c 246: See note following RCW 10.64.140.

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 57: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.